Tennessee statutes. Title 27 Appeal And Review
Chapter 3

Appeals Generally

27-3-101 — 27-3-106.
[Reserved.]

In all other cases determined in the county court, an appeal may be taken to the circuit court, or, both parties consenting, to the proper appellate court.

Code 1858, § 3173 (deriv. Acts 1813, ch. 78, § 2); Shan., § 4908; Code 1932, § 9060; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-307; Acts 1981, ch. 449, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by T.R.A.P. 3(d).

Cross-References. Appeals from county court to circuit court, §27-4-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 22.

27-3-108 — 27-3-127.
[Reserved.]

The court shall also, in all cases, where, in its opinion, complete justice cannot be had by reason of some defect in the record, want of proper parties, or oversight without culpable negligence, remand the cause to the court below for further proceedings, with proper directions to effectuate the objects of the order, and upon such terms as may be deemed right.

Code 1858, § 3170; Shan., § 4905; Code 1932, § 9054; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-329.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be superseded by T.R.A.P. 24(e).

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Amendments, § 7; 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, §§ 137, 251; 12 Tenn. Juris., Exceptions, Bill of, § 13.

27-3-129, 27-3-130.
[Reserved.]

Notwithstanding Rule 5(c)(2) of the Tennessee Rules of Criminal Procedure to the contrary, the defendant may in any case covered by such rule appeal a verdict of guilty or the sentence imposed or both to the circuit or criminal court for a trial de novo with or without a jury.

Demand for a jury trial shall be made at the time of filing an appeal under § 27-5-108, to the circuit or criminal court. If such demand is not made at the time of filing the appeal, the right to a trial by jury is waived.

Acts 1984, ch. 879, §§ 1, 2; 1985, ch. 397, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 25.4.

Attorney General Opinions. Where a defendant charged with contributing to the delinquency of a child submits to the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, waives the right to a jury trial on that charge, and is then convicted, the defendant may file an appeal in either the circuit court or the criminal court, OAG 00-157, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 160 (10/17/00).

27-3-107. Appeal from county court in cases other than equity.

27-3-128. Remand for correction of record.

27-3-131. Appeals in misdemeanor cases — Trial de novo — Jury trial.